California statutes. Vehicle Code
(2) Determine the total number of law enforcement vehicles authorized to participate in a pursuit. Establish the authorized number of law enforcement units and supervisors who may be involved in a pursuit, describe the responsibility of each authorized unit and the role of each peace officer and supervisor, and specify if and when additional units are authorized.

(3) Determine the communication procedures to be followed during a pursuit. Specify pursuit coordination and control procedures and determine assignment of communications responsibility by unit and organizational entity.

(4) Determine the role of the supervisor in managing and controlling a pursuit. Supervisory responsibility shall include management and control of a pursuit, assessment of risk factors associated with a pursuit, and when to terminate a pursuit.

(5) Determine driving tactics and the circumstances under which the tactics may be appropriate.

(6) Determine authorized pursuit intervention tactics. Pursuit intervention tactics include, but are not limited to, blocking, ramming, boxing, and roadblock procedures. The policy shall specify under what circumstances and conditions each approved tactic is authorized to be used.

(7) Determine the factors to be considered by a peace officer and supervisor in determining speeds throughout a pursuit. Evaluation shall take into consideration public safety, peace officer safety, and safety of the occupants in a fleeing vehicle.

(8) Determine the role of air support, where available. Air support shall include coordinating the activities of resources on the ground, reporting on the progress of a pursuit, and providing peace officers and supervisors with information to evaluate whether or not to continue the pursuit.

(9) Determine when to terminate or discontinue a pursuit. Factors to be considered include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Ongoing evaluation of risk to the public or pursuing peace officer.

(B) The protection of the public, given the known or reasonably suspected offense and apparent need for immediate capture against the risks to the public and peace officers.

(C) Vehicular or pedestrian traffic safety and volume.

(D) Weather conditions.

(E) Traffic conditions.

(F) Speeds.

(G) Availability of air support.

(H) Procedures when an offender is identified and may be apprehended at a later time or when the location of the pursuit vehicle is no longer known.

(10) Determine procedures for apprehending an offender following a pursuit. Safety of the public and peace officers during the law enforcement effort to capture an offender shall be an important factor.

(11) Determine effective coordination, management, and control of interjurisdictional pursuits. The policy shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Supervisory control and management of a pursuit that enters another jurisdiction.

(B) Communications and notifications among the agencies involved.

(C) Involvement in another jurisdiction’s pursuit.

(D) Roles and responsibilities of units and coordination, management, and control at the termination of an interjurisdictional pursuit.

(12) Reporting and postpursuit analysis as required by Section 14602.1. Establish the level and procedures of postpursuit analysis, review, and feedback. Establish procedures for written postpursuit review and followup.

(d) “Regular and periodic training” under this section means annual training that shall include, at a minimum, coverage of each of the subjects and elements set forth in subdivision (c) and that shall comply, at a minimum, with the training guidelines established pursuant to Section 13519.8 of the Penal Code.

(e) The requirements of subdivision (c) represent minimum policy standards and do not limit an agency from adopting additional policy requirements. The requirements in subdivision (c) are consistent with the 1995 California Law Enforcement Vehicle Pursuit Guidelines developed by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training pursuant to Section 13519.8 of the Penal Code that will assist agencies in the development of their pursuit policies. Nothing in this section precludes the adoption of a policy that limits or restricts pursuits.

(f) A determination of whether a public agency has complied with subdivisions (c) and (d) is a question of law for the court.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2007.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 10) and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 485, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Section operative July 1, 2007, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Private Owners [17150. - 17159.]

17150.

Every owner of a motor vehicle is liable and responsible for death or injury to person or property resulting from a negligent or wrongful act or omission in the operation of the motor vehicle, in the business of the owner or otherwise, by any person using or operating the same with the permission, express or implied, of the owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 702.)
-------------------------------------------

17150.5.

The presumptions created by Section 803 of the Family Code as to the acquisition of property by a married woman by an instrument in writing shall not apply in an action based on Section 17150 with respect to the acquisition of a motor vehicle by a married woman and her husband.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 134.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

17151.

(a) The liability of an owner, bailee of an owner, or personal representative of a decedent imposed by this chapter and not arising through the relationship of principal and agent or master and servant is limited to the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for the death of or injury to one person in any one accident and, subject to the limit as to one person, is limited to the amount of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for the death of or injury to more than one person in any one accident and is limited to the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) for damage to property of others in any one accident.

(b) An owner, bailee of an owner, or personal representative of a decedent is not liable under this chapter for damages imposed for the sake of example and by way of punishing the operator of the vehicle. Nothing in this subdivision makes an owner, bailee, or personal representative immune from liability for damages imposed for the sake of example and by way of punishing him for his own wrongful conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 862, Sec. 8.5.)
-------------------------------------------

17152.

In any action against an owner, bailee of an owner, or personal representative of a decedent on account of liability imposed by Sections 17150, 17154, or 17159 for the negligent or wrongful act or omission of the operator of a vehicle, the operator shall be made a party defendant if service of process can be made in a manner sufficient to secure personal jurisdiction over the operator. Upon recovery of judgment, recourse shall first be had against the property of the operator so served.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 702.)
-------------------------------------------

17153.

If there is recovery under this chapter against an owner, bailee of an owner, or personal representative of a decedent, the owner, bailee of an owner, or personal representative of a decedent is subrogated to all the rights of the person injured or whose property has been injured and may recover from the operator the total amount of any judgment and costs recovered against the owner, bailee of an owner, or personal representative of a decedent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 702.)
-------------------------------------------

17154.

If the bailee of an owner with the permission, express or implied, of the owner permits another to operate the motor vehicle of the owner, then the bailee and the driver shall both be deemed operators of the vehicle of the owner within the meaning of Sections 17152 and 17153.

Every bailee of a motor vehicle is liable and responsible for death or injury to person or property resulting from a negligent or wrongful act or omission in the operation of the motor vehicle, in the business of the bailee or otherwise, by any person using or operating the same with the permission, express or implied, of the bailee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 702.)
-------------------------------------------

17155.

If two or more persons are injured or killed in one accident, the owner, bailee of an owner, or personal representative of a decedent may settle and pay any bona fide claims for damages arising out of personal injuries or death, whether reduced by judgment or not, and the payments shall diminish, to the extent of those payments, the person’s total liability on account of the accident. Payments aggregating the full sum of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) shall extinguish all liability of the owner, bailee of an owner, or personal representative of a decedent for death or personal injury arising out of the accident that exists pursuant to this chapter, and did not arise through the negligent or wrongful act or omission of the owner, bailee of an owner, or personal representative of a decedent nor through the relationship of principal and agent or master and servant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 660.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17156.

If a motor vehicle is sold under a contract of conditional sale whereby the title to such motor vehicle remains in the vendor, such vendor or his assignee shall not be deemed an owner within the provisions of this chapter, but the vendee or his assignee shall be deemed the owner notwithstanding the terms of such contract, until the vendor or his assignee retake possession of the motor vehicle. A chattel mortgagee of a motor vehicle out of possession is not an owner within the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 702.)
-------------------------------------------

17157.

If a motor vehicle is gratuitously loaned to a school district, the bailee and not the bailor shall be deemed to be the owner within the provisions of this chapter notwithstanding the terms of any contract, until the bailor retakes possession of the motor vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 289.)
-------------------------------------------

17158.

No person riding in or occupying a vehicle owned by him and driven by another person with his permission has any right of action for civil damages against the driver of the vehicle or against any other person legally liable for the conduct of the driver on account of personal injury to or the death of the owner during the ride, unless the plaintiff in any such action establishes that the injury or death proximately resulted from the intoxication or willful misconduct of the driver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 803.)
-------------------------------------------

17159.

Every person who is a personal representative of a decedent who has control or possession of a motor vehicle subject to administration for the purpose of administration of an estate is, during the period of such administration, or until the vehicle has been distributed under order of the court or he has complied with the requirements of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 5602, liable and responsible for death or injury to person or property resulting from a negligent or wrongful act or omission in the operation of the motor vehicle by any person using or operating the same with the permission, express or implied, of the personal representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 702.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Uninsured Owners [17200. - 17202.]

17200.

Where an uninsured owner or operator has obtained a judgment against or agreed to a settlement with the owner or operator of an insured motor vehicle based on the negligence of the insured owner or operator, the amount of the judgment or settlement payable by the insured or his or her insurer shall be reduced by the amount paid or payable to the insured owner or operator or occupants of the insured motor vehicles or their heirs or legal representatives from coverage provided by an uninsured motorist endorsement where the claim of the insured, the owner, or occupants of the insured motor vehicle and the uninsured motorist arise out of the same accident. If the insured or his or her insurer becomes entitled to a reduction, the reduction shall not exceed the amount of the settlement or judgment awarded the uninsured owner or operator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1252, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

17201.

The payment of any settlement with an uninsured owner or operator or the payment of any final judgment for damages obtained by an uninsured owner or operator in a civil action against an insured owner or operator shall not be made until the claims of the owner, the operator, or the occupants of the insured motor vehicle, if any, or their heirs or legal representatives for benefits under the uninsured motorist endorsement are settled by the insurer and the claimants under the uninsured motorist endorsement or are determined by the arbitrator in arbitration proceedings conducted pursuant to Section 11580.2 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1252, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

17202.

This article is not intended to affect the rights granted pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 11580.2 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1252, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Liability for Damage to Highway [17300. - 17303.]

17300.

(a) A person who willfully or negligently damages a street or highway, or its appurtenances, including, but not limited to, guardrails, signs, traffic signals, snow poles, and similar facilities, is liable for the reasonable cost of repair or replacement thereof.

(b) A person who willfully damages or destroys a memorial sign placed by the Department of Transportation, including, but not limited to, a sign memorializing a victim under Section 101.10 of the Streets and Highways Code, is liable for that damage or destruction for the highest of the following amounts:

(1) One thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(2) The actual repair cost or replacement cost, whichever is applicable.

(c) A person who willfully or negligently causes or permits the contents of a vehicle to be deposited upon a street or highway, or its appurtenances, is liable for the reasonable costs of removing those contents from the street or highway or its appurtenances.

(d) The liability stated in this section also applies to an owner of a vehicle operated with the owner’s permission, as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 17150), and includes liability for the reasonable cost of necessary safety precautions, including, but not limited to, warning traffic, the removal of debris resulting from accidents, the removal of any materials, or providing detours.

(e) The Department of Transportation and local authorities, with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions, may present claims for liability under this section, bring actions for recovery thereon, and settle and compromise, in their discretion, claims arising under this section.

(f) If the Department of Transportation or a local authority provides services on a highway outside its jurisdiction, at the request of the department or the local authority that has jurisdiction over that highway, the department or the local authority may present a claim for liability for rendering this service under this section, bring actions for recovery thereon, and, in its discretion, settle and compromise the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 419, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17301.

(a) Any person driving any vehicle, object, or contrivance over a highway or bridge is liable for all damages which the highway or bridge may sustain as a result of any illegal operation, driving or moving of the vehicle, object, or contrivance, or as a result of operating, driving, or moving any vehicle, object, or contrivance weighing in excess of the maximum weight specified in this code which is operated under a special permit issued by the Department of Transportation.

(b) Whenever the driver is not the owner of the vehicle, object, or contrivance but is operating, driving, or moving the same with the express or implied permission of the owner, the owner and driver are jointly and severally liable for the damage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

17302.

The driver, or the owner and driver, jointly, as the case may be, are also liable for all damages that any highway or bridge sustains as the result of any operation, driving, or moving of any vehicle that exceeds any of the limitations imposed by Division 15 (commencing with Section 35000), Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 29000) of Division 13, Section 21461 with respect to a sign erected under Section 35655, and Sections 21712 and 23114 even though the vehicle is exempted from the limitations by Section 35001, 35104, 35105, 35106, 35108, 35250, 35400, 35414, or 36615.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 124.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

17303.

Damages under Sections 17301 and 17302 may be recovered in a civil action brought by the authorities in control of the highway or bridge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Service of Process [17450. - 17463.]

17450.

As used in this chapter, “nonresident” means a person who is not a resident of this State at the time the accident or collision occurs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

17451.

The acceptance by a nonresident of the rights and privileges conferred upon him by this code or any operation by himself or agent of a motor vehicle anywhere within this state, or in the event the nonresident is the owner of a motor vehicle then by the operation of the vehicle anywhere within this state by any person with his express or implied permission, is equivalent to an appointment by the nonresident of the director or his successor in office to be his true and lawful attorney upon whom may be served all lawful processes in any action or proceeding against the nonresident operator or nonresident owner growing out of any accident or collision resulting from the operation of any motor vehicle anywhere within this state by himself or agent, which appointment shall also be irrevocable and binding upon his executor or administrator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 720.)
-------------------------------------------

17452.

Where the nonresident has died prior to the commencement of an action brought pursuant to this article, service of process shall be made on the executor or administrator of the nonresident in the same manner and on the same notice as is provided in the case of the nonresident. Where an action has been duly commenced under the provisions of this article by service upon a defendant who dies thereafter, the court shall allow the action to be continued against his executor or administrator upon motion with such notice as the court deems proper.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

17453.

The acceptance of rights and privileges under this code or any operation of a motor vehicle anywhere within this state as specified in Section 17451 shall be a signification of the irrevocable agreement of the nonresident, binding as well upon his executor or administrator, that process against him which is served in the manner provided in this article shall be of the same legal force and validity as if served on him personally in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 720.)
-------------------------------------------

17454.

Service of process shall be made by leaving one copy of the summons and complaint in the hands of the director or in his office at Sacramento or by mailing either by certified or registered mail, addressee only, return receipt requested, the copy of the summons and complaint to the office of the director in Sacramento. Service shall be effective as of the day the return receipt is received from the director’s office. A fee of two dollars ($2) for each nonresident to be served shall be paid to the director at the time of service of the copy of the summons and complaint and such service shall be a sufficient service on the nonresident subject to compliance with Section 17455.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1313.)
-------------------------------------------

17455.

A notice of service and a copy of the summons and complaint shall be forthwith sent by registered mail by the plaintiff or his attorney to the defendant. Personal service of the notice and a copy of the summons and complaint upon the defendant wherever found outside this State shall be the equivalent of service by mail.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

17456.

Proof of compliance with Section 17455 shall be made in the event of service by mail by affidavit of the plaintiff or his attorney showing said mailing, together with the return receipt of the United States post office bearing the signature of the defendant. The affidavit and receipt shall be appended to the original summons which shall be filed with the court from out of which the summons issued within such time as the court may allow for the return of the summons.

In the event of personal service outside this State, compliance with Section 17455 may be proved by the return of any duly constituted public officer, qualified to serve like process of and in the state or jurisdiction where the defendant is found, showing such service to have been made. The return shall be appended to the original summons which shall be filed as aforesaid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

17457.

The court in which the action is pending may order such continuances as may be necessary to afford the defendant reasonable opportunity to defend the action.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

17458.

The director shall keep a record of all process served upon him under this article which record shall show the day and hour of service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

17459.

The acceptance by a resident of this state of a certificate of ownership or a certificate of registration of any motor vehicle or any renewal thereof, issued under the provisions of this code, shall constitute the consent by the person that service of summons may be made upon him within or without this state, whether or not he is then a resident of this state, in any action brought in the courts of this state upon a cause of action arising in this state out of the ownership or operation of the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 622.)
-------------------------------------------

17460.

The acceptance or retention by a resident of this state of a driver’s license issued pursuant to the provisions of this code, shall constitute the consent of the person that service of summons may be made upon him within or without this state, whether or not he is then a resident of this state, in any action brought in the courts of this state upon a cause of action arising in this state out of his operation of a motor vehicle anywhere within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 618.)
-------------------------------------------

17461.

In the event summons is served outside of this state, pursuant to Sections 17459 and 17460, it may be served and proof of service shall be made, in the manner provided by Sections 17454, 17455, and 17456 for service of summons upon a nonresident, or it may be served pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 622.)
-------------------------------------------

17462.

In the event of service outside the State, the person so served shall have 60 days in which to appear in the action in which the summons is issued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

17463.

Notwithstanding any provisions of Section 351 of the Code of Civil Procedure to the contrary, when summons may be personally served upon a person as provided in Sections 17459 and 17460, the time of his absence from this State is part of the time limited for the commencement of the action described in those sections, except when he is out of this State and cannot be located through the exercise of reasonable diligence, except this section in no event shall be applicable in any action or proceeding commenced on or before September 7, 1956.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Civil Liability of Persons Signing License Applications of Minors [17700. - 17714.]

17700.

For the purposes of this chapter, all persons under 18 years of age are minors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1748.)
-------------------------------------------

17701.

No application for a driver’s license shall be granted by the department to any minor unless it is signed and verified by the father and mother of such minor, if both father and mother are living and have custody of the minor.

If only one parent is living or has custody, the application shall be signed and verified by that parent.

If neither parent is living or has custody, the application shall be signed and verified by the guardian, or if there is no guardian, by a person having custody of the minor.

If the minor is a dependent or ward of the court, the application may be signed by a grandparent, sibling over the age of 18 years, aunt, uncle, or foster parent with whom the minor resides. The probation officer or child protective services worker acting as an officer of the court, on behalf of a child, may also sign and verify the application of a minor who is a dependent or ward of the court, if the minor files proof of financial responsibility as provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 16430) of Chapter 3 of Division 7 at the time of application. Prior to signing the application, the probation officer or child protective services worker shall notify the foster parents or other responsible party of his or her intent to sign and verify the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 865, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

17702.

If a minor under the age of 18 years is married, the application may be signed and verified by the adult spouse of the minor or by the parents of either spouse or in lieu of the signature, the minor may file proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 974, Sec. 12.   Effective September 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

17703.

If the person or persons required to sign and verify the application of a minor are not residents of this state, the application shall be signed and verified by a person residing within this state who has custody of the minor, or the department may accept an application signed and verified by the minor and accompanied by proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 974, Sec. 13.   Effective September 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

17704.

If, at any time during the minority of the person who has given proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430, the proof fails, the department shall immediately cancel the license until proof of the licensee’s continued financial responsibility has been given or until the minor has otherwise complied with the requirements of this code relative to the issuance of a driver’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 974, Sec. 14.   Effective September 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

17705.

If the person who is required to sign and verify the application of a minor gives his or her written consent, or the minor is emancipated other than by marriage, the department may accept an application signed and verified only by the minor and accompanied by proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430. The person giving the consent to but not signing or verifying the application shall not be subject to the civil liability specified in Sections 17707 and 17708 merely by reason of having given consent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 974, Sec. 15.   Effective September 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

17706.

(a) If the person who is required by the provisions of this code to sign and verify the application of a minor gives his written consent, the department may accept an application signed and verified by the minor and his employer, but in such case the department shall issue to the minor only a driver’s license restricted to the operation of vehicles by the minor within the scope of his employment by the employer, unless the employer in writing authorizes the issuance of an unrestricted driver’s license.

(b) The person giving his consent to, but not signing or verifying, the application as provided in this section shall not be subject to the civil liability specified in Sections 17707 and 17708 merely by reason of having given such consent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

17707.

Any civil liability of a minor arising out of his driving a motor vehicle upon a highway during his minority is hereby imposed upon the person who signed and verified the application of the minor for a license and the person shall be jointly and severally liable with the minor for any damages proximately resulting from the negligent or wrongful act or omission of the minor in driving a motor vehicle, except that an employer signing the application shall be subject to the provisions of this section only if an unrestricted driver’s license has been issued to the minor pursuant to the employer’s written authorization.

No liability may be imposed under this section or under Section 17708 on the state or county, or on a probation officer or child protective services worker acting as an officer of the court for damages caused solely by the negligence or willful misconduct of a minor driver whose application for a driver’s license was signed by the child protective services worker or probation officer while the minor was a dependent or ward of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 865, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

17708.

Any civil liability of a minor, whether licensed or not under this code, arising out of his driving a motor vehicle upon a highway with the express or implied permission of the parents or the person or guardian having custody of the minor is hereby imposed upon the parents, person, or guardian and the parents, person, or guardian shall be jointly and severally liable with the minor for any damages proximately resulting from the negligent or wrongful act or omission of the minor in driving a motor vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 702.)
-------------------------------------------

17709.

(a) No person, or group of persons collectively, shall incur liability for a minor’s negligent or wrongful act or omission under Sections 17707 and 17708 in any amount exceeding fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for injury to or death of one person as a result of any one accident or, subject to the limit as to one person, exceeding thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for injury to or death of all persons as a result of any one accident or exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) for damage to property of others as a result of any one accident. 

(b) No person is liable under Section 17707 or 17708 for damages imposed for the sake of example and by way of punishing the minor. Nothing in this subdivision makes any person immune from liability for damages imposed for the sake of example and by way of punishing him for his own wrongful conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 862.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.

The person signing a minor’s application for a license is not liable under this chapter for a negligent or wrongful act or omission of the minor committed when the minor is acting as the agent or servant of any person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 702.)
-------------------------------------------

17711.

Any person who has signed and verified the application of a minor for a driver’s license or any employer who has authorized the issuance of a license to a minor and who desires to be relieved from the joint and several liability imposed by reason of having signed and verified such application, may file a verified application with the department requesting that the license of the minor be canceled. The department shall cancel the license, except as provided in subdivision (e) of Section 17712. Thereafter, the person shall be relieved from the liability imposed under this chapter by reason of having signed and verified the original application on account of any subsequent willful misconduct or negligent operation of a motor vehicle by the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 645.)
-------------------------------------------

17712.

(a) The department, upon receipt of satisfactory evidence of the death of the father and mother or the person or guardian who signed and verified the application of any minor under Section 17701 or any employer who signed and verified the application of any minor under subdivision (a) of Section 17706, shall cancel the license, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(b) The department, upon receipt of the verified application of a person who has given written consent to the issuance of a license to a minor as prescribed in Sections 17705 and 17706, for the cancellation of such minor’s license, shall cancel the license, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(c) The department, upon receipt of satisfactory evidence that there has been a change of custody of a minor licensed under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12500) of Division 6, and upon written request by the person to whom custody has been transferred, shall cancel the license.

(d) The department, upon receipt of satisfactory evidence showing that any minor to whom was issued a license pursuant to Section 17706, has left the employ of the employer who signed and verified the application for the license, shall cancel the license, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(e) The department, upon written request by the person to whom custody of a minor has been transferred, shall transfer the liability imposed under this chapter to such person upon receipt of such person’s written verified application for acceptance of liability. Upon receipt, by the department, of such application for acceptance of liability, the person who had signed and verified the application of the minor for the driver’s license presently held by the minor shall be relieved from the liability imposed under this chapter. If such application for acceptance of liability is on file with the department prior to the receipt of a request for cancellation by the person who had signed the application of the minor for a driver’s license, the license issued under such application shall not be canceled so long as the license is otherwise valid. If, however, such application for acceptance of liability is not on file with the department prior to the receipt of a request for cancellation by the person who had signed the application of the minor for a driver’s license, the license issued under such application shall be canceled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 645.)
-------------------------------------------

17714.

In the event, in one or more actions, judgment is rendered against a defendant under this chapter based upon the negligent or wrongful act or omission of a minor in the operation of a vehicle, and also by reason of such act or omission rendered against such defendant under Article 2 (commencing with Section 17150) of Chapter 1 of Division 9, then such judgment or judgments shall not be cumulative but recovery shall be limited to the amount specified in Section 17709.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 702.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10. ACCIDENTS AND ACCIDENT REPORTS [20000. - 20018.]



CHAPTER 1. Accidents and Accident Reports [20000. - 20018.]

20000.

The provisions of this division apply upon highways and elsewhere throughout the State, unless expressly provided otherwise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

20001.

(a) The driver of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to a person, other than himself or herself, or in the death of a person shall immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of the accident and shall fulfill the requirements of Sections 20003 and 20004.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a person who violates subdivision (a) shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison, or in a county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(2) If the accident described in subdivision (a) results in death or permanent, serious injury, a person who violates subdivision (a) shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or four years, or in a county jail for not less than 90 days nor more than one year, or by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. However, the court, in the interests of justice and for reasons stated in the record, may reduce or eliminate the minimum imprisonment required by this paragraph.

(3) In imposing the minimum fine required by this subdivision, the court shall take into consideration the defendant’s ability to pay the fine and, in the interests of justice and for reasons stated in the record, may reduce the amount of that minimum fine to less than the amount otherwise required by this subdivision.

(c) A person who flees the scene of the crime after committing a violation of Section 191.5 of, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code, upon conviction of any of those sections, in addition and consecutive to the punishment prescribed, shall be punished by an additional term of imprisonment of five years in the state prison. This additional term shall not be imposed unless the allegation is charged in the accusatory pleading and admitted by the defendant or found to be true by the trier of fact. The court shall not strike a finding that brings a person within the provisions of this subdivision or an allegation made pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) As used in this section, “permanent, serious injury” means the loss or permanent impairment of function of a bodily member or organ.
